California, session 20252026, SB1006.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 69435 of the Education Code is amended to read:69435. (a) (1) A Cal Grant B award shall be used only for tuition, student fees, and access costs in a for-credit instructional program that is not less than one academic year in length.(2) The commission, or a qualifying institution pursuant to Article 8 (commencing with Section 69450), shall award access grants in a student’s first academic year. In subsequent years, the award shall include an additional amount to pay tuition or fees, or both, to attend college at a public or private four-year college or university or other qualifying institution for all Cal Grant B awards pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 66021.2. In no event shall the total award in any year exceed the applicant’s calculated financial need.(3) Not more than 2 percent of new Cal Grant B recipients enrolling for the first time in an institution of postsecondary education shall be eligible for payments for tuition or fees, or both, in their first academic year of attendance. The commission shall adopt regulations specifying the criteria used to determine which applicants, if any, receive both tuition and fees plus the access grant in the first year of enrollment. Priority shall be given to students with the lowest expected family contribution pursuant to Section 69432.7 and the highest level of academic merit.(b) (1) Commencing with the 2027–28 award year, an award for access costs under this article shall adhere to both of the following:(1)Be shall be in an annual amount of no less than one thousand six hundred dollars ($1,600) the maximum per-student amount provided in the 2025–26 award year or, if the recipient meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 69465, the amount of the award provided pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 69465), or or, if the recipient meets the qualifying criteria pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 69470, the amount of the award provided pursuant to Article 10 (commencing with Section 69470). These amounts may be adjusted in the annual Budget Act.(2) Include The award amounts established pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be increased annually by the amount of the percentage increase, if any, in the California Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers as calculated and certified by the commission from data reported by the Department of Industrial Relations. No later than January 15, 2027, for the 2027–28 academic year, and no later than September 1 of the year before each academic year thereafter, the commission shall calculate and certify the percentage change using the data from the two most recent June indices. If the California Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers decreases from the prior academic year, the award amount amounts shall remain at its their most recently certified level.